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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE (European Spec.)

DI9F4-03

DTC 34 (2) | Turbocharger system malfunction
DTC 34 (3) | Turbocharger stick detected (Close)
DTC 34 (4) | Turbocharger stick detected (Open)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
When the condition that the turbocharger pressure exceeds the
34 standard value for 0.5 sec. or more is detected. *VNTvalve
e Turbocharger
When the condition that for 60 sgc. or more the turbocharger |, EGRvalve
pressureis 20kPa (0.2 kgf/cm , 1.4 psi) ormore abovethe « Airflow meter
34©@ value that is set based o.n the engine revolution and the «Engine ECU
amount of fuel injection is detected.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

If DTC 35 is output simultaneously, first troubleshoot DTC 35.
Whenusing hand -heldtester:

1 Check connection of vacuum hose.
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NG> Repair or replace.
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2CheckvacuumbetweentrubochargerandE  -VRVforintake pressure change at
900 rpm.

PREPARATION:

(a)Usinga3 -way connector, connectavacuumgaugetothe hose betweenthe E -VRV andtrubocharger.
(b) Warmuptheenginetoabove80  °C (176°F).

CHECK:

Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.

RESULT:

Type Vacuum

| 0kPa(0mmHg,in.Hg) -50kPa(375mmHg, 14.8in.Hg)

Il Above50kPa (375mmHg, 14.8in.Hg)

Type> Go to step 7.

Type | \

3 | Check voltage between terminal VNT of engine ECU connector and body ground.

ON PREPARATION:
@ VNT (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
A\ (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

‘ AR SARANN SRR AN) GO0 DHHHHHHHH%M CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal VNT of the engine ECU

connector and body ground.
OK:
Voltage:9 -14V

N A16790

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
During EGR system is ON (engine speed 900 rpm), check the
waveformbetweenterminalsVNTandE 1 ofengine ECU con-
nector.

<« GND HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.

NG> Go to step 5.

EGR SignalWaveforms  5Vv/DIV

EGR

1 msec./Division A05967
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4 | Check operation of E-VRYV for intake pressure change.

E-VRV: OFF

A15518

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the vacuum hoses from the E-VRV.
(b) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON and the push hand-held tes-
ter main switch ON.
(d) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check the operation of the E-VRV when it is operated by the
hand-held tester.
OK:
E-VRV ON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E-VRV OFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

0K> Go to step 7.

5 | Check E-VRYV for intake pressure change (See page TC-15).

@

NG> Replace E-VRV.

6 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between E-VRV and engine
ECU, and E-VRV and EFI main relay (Marking : EFI) (See page IN-19).
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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Check turbocharger assembly (See page TC-1).

NG> Replace turbocharger.

@

Check EGR valve (See page EC-2).

NG> Replace EGR valve.

@

Check air flow meter (See page DI-26).

NG> Replace air flow meter.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).

Whennotusinghand -heldtester:

1

Checkthe connection of vacuum hose.

NG> Repair or replace.
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900 rpm.

2 [ Check vacuum between trubocharger and E-VRV for intake pressure change at

PREPARATION:

(@) Using a 3—-way connector, connect a vacuum gauge to the hose between the E-VRV and trubocharger.
(b) Warm up the engine to above 80°C (176°F).

CHECK:

Check the vacuum at 900 rpm.

RESULT:

Type Vacuum
I 0 kPa (0 mmHg, in. Hg) — 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in. Hg)
] Above 50 kPa (375 mmHg, 14.8 in. Hg)
Type> Go to step 6.
Type |

3 [ Check operation of E-VRV.

A18530
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PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E3 connector from the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the E-VRV operation.
(1) Connect between terminal VNT of the engine ECU
connector and body ground (ON).
(2) Disconnect between terminal VNT of the engine
ECU connector and body ground (OFF).

OK:
E-VRV ON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
E-VRV OFF:
Air from port E flows out through air filter.

OK> Go to step 6.
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4 | Check E-VRV for intake pressure change (See page ED-10).

@

5 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between E-VRV and engine
ECU, and E-VRV and EFI main relay (Marking : EFI) (See page IN-19).

3

6 | Check turbocharger assembly (See page TC-1).

NG> Replace E-VRV.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG> Replace turbocharger.

OK

7 | Check EGR valve (See page EC-2).

NG> Replace EGR valve.
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8 [ Check air flow meter (See page DI-26).

Replace air flow meter.

NG>
@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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